test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_oppad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - oppâđ: # MLO, checked
    oppâđ+V+Inf: oppâđ
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oopâm
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: oopah
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáppá
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáppeen
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: oppâvettee
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: oppâv
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: oppâp
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: oppâvetteđ
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáppih
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: oppim
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: oppih
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oopâi
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oopáim
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oopáid
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oopáin
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oopâim
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oopâid
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: oppii
    oppâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: opâččim
    oppâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: opâččih
    oppâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: opâččij
    oppâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: opâččáim
    oppâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: opâččáid
    oppâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: opâččáin
    oppâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: opâččijm
    oppâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: opâččijd
    oppâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: opâččii
    oppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: uáppeem
    oppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: uáppeeh
    oppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: oopâš
    oppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: opâžeen
    oppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: oopâšvettee
    oppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: opâžává
    oppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: opâžep
    oppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: oopâšvetteđ
    oppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: opâžeh
    oppâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: oopâ
    oppâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uápus
    oppâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uáppoon
    oppâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uáppee
    oppâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uáppus
    oppâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uáppup
    oppâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: oppâđ
    oppâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uáppus
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: oopâ
    oppâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: oppâm
    oppâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: opâččii
    oppâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: oppii
    oppâđ+V+Imprt+ConNeg: oopâ
    oppâđ+V+PrsPrc: uáppee
    oppâđ+V+PrfPrc: oppâm
    oppâđ+V+Actio+Nom: oppâm
    oppâđ+V+Actio+Ess: oppâmin
    oppâđ+V+Actio+Loc: oppâmist
    oppâđ+V+Actio+Ill: oppâmân
    oppâđ+V+Actio+Com: opâdijn
    oppâđ+V+VAbess: opâhánnáá
